Hawaii, session 2025, HB877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that encampments, including tents, makeshift shelters, and other temporary structures used for habitation, create a complex and pressing problem when close to school grounds. When close to schools, these encampments can threaten the safety, health, and overall well-being of students, school staff, and surrounding communities.  Encampments can introduce environmental hazards, obstruct public access, and pose public safety concerns. The purpose of this Act is to prohibit the erection, placement, construction, or maintenance of an encampment within one hundred feet from the property line of a pre-K-12 public or private school or school facility on public or private property. SECTION 2.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter school encampment buffer zone §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Buffer zone" means one hundred feet from the property line of a pre-K-12 public or private school or school facility on public or private property. "Encampment" means a tent, makeshift shelter, or any other temporary structure used for habitation. §   -2  Buffer zone; schools. (a)  No person shall erect, place, construct, or maintain an encampment within a buffer zone of a pre-K-12 public or private school or school facility. (b)  Violation of subsection (a) shall be a petty misdemeanor. (c) Nothing in this section shall preclude a person from being charged with a trespassing violation pursuant to chapter 708 or any other violation. (d) The department of education, charter schools, and private schools may collaborate with law enforcement officers to identify and remove encampments within the buffer zone. (e) Law enforcement personnel enforcing this section shall provide information related to temporary housing and homelessness assistance programs to individuals displaced from encampments. (f) Law enforcement personnel shall take the personal belongings of individuals displaced from encampments into custody and store them at the police station or other designated location, to be returned to the individual upon release from custody." SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.